California, session 20252026, AB1760.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 1621 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1621.The board shall utilize in the administration of its licensure examinations only examiners whom it has appointed and who meet the following criteria:(a)Possession of a valid license to practice dentistry in this state or possession of a valid license in one of the registered dental assistant categories licensed under this chapter.(b)Practice as a licensed dentist or in a licensure category described in subdivision (a) for at least five years preceding the examiner’s appointment.(c)Hold no position as an officer or faculty member at any college, school, or institution that provides instruction in the same licensure category as that held by the examiner.SEC. 2.SECTION 1. Section 1628 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1628. Any person over 18 years of age is eligible to take an examination before the board upon making application therefor and meeting all of the following requirements:(a) Paying the fee for applicants for examination provided by this chapter.(b) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of having graduated from a dental college approved by the board or by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association and presenting satisfactory evidence of having completed at dental school or schools the full number of academic years of undergraduate courses required for graduation. For purposes of this article, “dental college approved by the board” or “approved dental school” include a foreign dental school accredited by a body that has a reciprocal accreditation agreement with any commission or accreditation organization whose findings are accepted by the board.(c) If the applicant has been issued a degree of doctor of dental medicine or doctor of dental surgery by a foreign dental school, the applicant shall furnish all of the following documentary evidence to the board:(1) That the applicant has completed, in a dental school or schools approved by the board pursuant to Section 1636.5 or accredited pursuant to Section 1636.4, a resident course of professional instruction in dentistry for the full number of academic years of undergraduate courses required for graduation.(2) Subsequent thereto, the applicant has been issued by the dental school a dental diploma or a dental degree, as evidence of the successful completion of the course of dental instruction required for graduation.(d) An applicant who has been issued a dental diploma from a foreign dental school that has not, at the time of the applicant’s graduation from the school, been approved by the board pursuant to Section 1636.5 or accredited pursuant to Section 1636.4 shall not be eligible for examination until the applicant has successfully completed a minimum of two academic years of education at a dental college approved by the board pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1024) of Chapter 2 of Division 10 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations and has been issued a degree of doctor of dental medicine or doctor of dental surgery or its equivalent. This subdivision shall not apply to applicants who have successfully completed the requirements of Section 1636 as it read before it was repealed on January 1, 2004, on or before December 31, 2003, or who have successfully completed the requirements of Section 1628.2 on or before December 31, 2008. An applicant who has successfully completed the requirements of Section 1636 as it read before it was repealed on January 1, 2004, on or before December 31, 2003, or who has successfully completed the requirements of Section 1628.2 on or before December 31, 2008, shall be eligible to take the examination required by Section 1632, subject to the requirement set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1633.(e) Subdivisions (c) and (d) do not apply to a person who has been issued a degree of doctor of dental medicine or doctor of dental surgery by a foreign dental school accredited by a body that has a reciprocal accreditation agreement with any commission or accreditation organization whose findings are accepted by the board.SEC. 3.Section 1632.6 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 4.SEC. 2. Section 1633 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1633. (a) When an applicant for a license has received a grading of pass in any given subject, the applicant shall be exempt from reexamination on that subject in subsequent examinations before the board within two years after the examination on which the applicant received the exemption.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and Section 135, if an applicant fails a section of an examination required by Section 1632 after three attempts to successfully complete that section, the applicant shall retake the entire examination on subsequent attempts.SEC. 5.SEC. 3. Section 1635.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1635.5. (a) Notwithstanding Section 1634, the board may grant a license to practice dentistry to an applicant who has not taken an examination before the board, if the applicant submits all of the following to the board:(1) A completed application form and all fees required by the board.(2) Proof of an active and unrestricted license issued by another state, district, or territory of the United States to practice dentistry that is not subject to any current or pending disciplinary action such as revocation, suspension, or probation.(3) (A) Proof of one of the following:(i) That the applicant has been in active clinical practice in another state, district, or territory of the United States for a total of at least 5,000 hours within the past five years immediately preceding the date of the application. The applicant shall submit written documentation, executed by a licensed dentist who has knowledge of the applicant’s hours of practice or, if the applicant is in active clinical practice as a solo practitioner, executed by the applicant, verifying compliance with this requirement.(ii) That the applicant has been a full-time faculty member in an accredited dental education program and in active clinical practice for a total of at least 5,000 hours within the past five years immediately preceding the date of the application. The applicant shall submit written documentation, executed by the director, administrator, or other authorized representative of the dental education program, verifying the applicant’s compliance with this requirement.(iii) That the applicant has been engaged in full-time nonclinical practice requiring an active dentist’s license for federal, state, or local public health programs in another state, district, or territory of the United States for a minimum average of 40 hours per week for at least five years immediately preceding the date of the application. The applicant shall submit written documentation, executed by the director, administrator, or other authorized representative of the public health program, verifying the applicant’s compliance with this requirement.(B) The active clinical practice requirement prescribed by clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) may be met by submitting documentation showing any of the following:(i) That the applicant has completed a residency training program accredited by the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation, including, but not limited to, a general practice residency, an advanced education in general dentistry program, or a training program in a specialty recognized by the American Dental Association. The applicant may receive credit of 1,000 hours for each year, up to 2,000 hours, of clinical practice completed in the residency training program.(ii) That the applicant has agreed to practice dentistry full time for a minimum of 32 hours per week for two years in at least one primary care clinic licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code or primary care clinic exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, or a clinic owned or operated by a public hospital or health system, or a clinic owned and operated by a hospital that maintains the primary contract with a county government to fill the county’s role under Section 17000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The applicant shall submit written documentation, executed by the authorized agent of the clinic, verifying compliance with this requirement. The board may periodically request verification of compliance with these requirements.(iii) That the applicant has agreed to teach or practice dentistry in California for a minimum average of 40 hours per week for two years in at least one dental education program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association. Association Commission on Dental Accreditation. The applicant shall submit written documentation, executed by the authorized agent of the program, verifying compliance with this requirement. The board may periodically request verification of compliance with these requirements.(4) Proof that the applicant has not been subject to disciplinary action by any state in which the applicant is or has been previously licensed to practice dentistry. If the applicant has been subject to disciplinary action, the board shall review that action to determine if it presents sufficient evidence of a violation of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1670) to warrant the submission of additional information from the applicant or the denial of the application for licensure.(5) A signed release allowing the disclosure of information from the National Practitioner Data Bank and the verification of registration status with the federal Drug Enforcement Administration. The board shall review this information to determine if it presents sufficient evidence of a violation of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1670) to warrant the submission of additional information from the applicant or the denial of the application for licensure.(6) Proof that the applicant has not failed a state, regional, or national examination for licensure to practice dentistry under this chapter within five years prior to the date of the application for a license under this section. If the applicant subsequently passed the examination for licensure, the prior failure shall not make the applicant ineligible under this paragraph.(7) An acknowledgment by the applicant executed under penalty of perjury and automatic forfeiture of license, of the following:(A) That the information provided by the applicant to the board is true and correct, to the best of their knowledge and belief.(B) That the applicant has not been convicted of an offense involving conduct that would violate Section 810.(8) Documentation of 50 units of continuing education completed within two years of the date of the application under this section. The continuing education shall include the mandatory coursework prescribed by the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1645.(9) Any other information as specified by the board to the extent it is required of applicants for licensure by examination under this article.(b) The board shall provide in the application packet to each out-of-state dentist pursuant to this section the following information:(1) The location of dental personnel shortage areas that exist in the state.(2) Those not-for-profit clinics and public hospitals seeking to contract with licensees for dental services.(c) The board is authorized to contract with a third party or parties to review applications filed under this section and to advise the board as to whether the applications are complete. The contracting party, its agents, and its employees shall agree to be bound by all provisions of law applicable to the board, its members, and staff, governing custody and confidentiality of materials submitted by applicants for licensure.(d) The board may issue a temporary, restricted license, valid for two years, to an applicant qualified under clause (ii) or (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), that authorizes the holder to practice dentistry only in the facilities described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) or only to practice or teach dentistry at the accredited dental education programs described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), as applicable. The board shall immediately revoke the temporary license issued pursuant to this subdivision upon a finding that the requirements of clause (ii) or (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), as applicable, have not been met. Upon revocation of the license, the board shall issue a notice of revocation that shall require the licensee to immediately cease dental practice. Upon the licensee’s completion of the license requirements under this section and the expiration of the two-year term, all location restrictions on the license shall be removed and an unrestricted license shall be issued.(e) A license issued pursuant to this section shall be considered a valid, unrestricted license for purposes of Section 1972.SEC. 6.SEC. 4. Section 1638.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1638.1. (a) A dentist shall possess a current license in good standing and an elective facial cosmetic surgery permit to perform elective facial cosmetic surgical procedures authorized by this section.(b) The board may issue an elective facial cosmetic surgery permit to perform one of the following categories of elective facial cosmetic surgical procedures:(1) Cosmetic contouring of the osteocartilaginous facial structure, which may include, but is not limited to, rhinoplasty and otoplasty.(2) Cosmetic contouring or rejuvenation of the facial soft tissue, which may include, but is not limited to, facelift, blepharoplasty, facial skin resurfacing, or lip augmentation.(3) Procedures under both paragraphs (1) and (2).(c) A licensee who desires to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery shall apply to the board on an application form prescribed by the board and submit all of the following:(1) Proof of successful completion of an oral and maxillofacial surgery residency program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association.(2) Proof that the licensee has satisfied all of the criteria specified in either subparagraph (A) or (B):(A) (i) The licensee is certified, or is a candidate for certification, by the American Board of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgery.(ii) A letter from the program director of the accredited residency program, or from the director of a postresidency fellowship program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association, stating that the licensee has the education, training, and competence necessary to perform the surgical procedures set forth in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b) that the licensee has notified the board the licensee intends to perform.(iii) Documentation of at least 10 operative reports from residency training or proctored surgical procedures performed at minimum in the role of surgical first assistant within five years from the date of application for each category of permit set forth in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) for which the licensee seeks a permit. If the licensee seeks a permit set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the licensee shall submit 10 operative reports for each category specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b). Each operative report shall indicate all of the following:(I) Name of the licensee.(II) Category of procedure and specific type of procedure performed.(III) Date of the procedure.(IV) The role in which the licensee participated in the procedure.(iv) Documentation showing the surgical privileges the licensee possesses at any licensed general acute care hospital and any licensed outpatient surgical facility in this state.(B) (i) The licensee has been granted privileges by the medical staff at a licensed general acute care hospital to perform the surgical procedures set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) at that hospital.(ii) Documentation described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (A).(3) Proof that the licensee is on active status on the staff of a general acute care hospital and maintains the necessary privileges based on the bylaws of the hospital to maintain that status.(d) The application shall be accompanied by an application fee required by the board for an initial permit. The fee to renew a permit shall not exceed the maximum amount prescribed in Section 1724.(e) (1) The board shall appoint a credentialing committee to review the qualifications of each applicant for a permit. Upon completion of the review of an applicant, the committee shall make a recommendation to the board on whether to issue or not issue a permit to the applicant. If the credentialing committee is not satisfied that an applicant who has applied for a permit pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) has the training or competence to perform both categories of procedures described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b), the credentialing committee may recommend issuance of a permit limited to procedures of one category authorized by either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b).(2) The credentialing committee shall be comprised of five members, as follows:(A) A physician and surgeon with a specialty in plastic and reconstructive surgery who maintains active status on the staff of a licensed general acute care hospital in this state.(B) A physician and surgeon with a specialty in otolaryngology who maintains active status on the staff of a licensed general acute care hospital in this state.(C) Three oral and maxillofacial surgeons licensed by the board who are board certified by the American Board of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgeons, and who maintain active status on the staff of a licensed general acute care hospital in this state, at least one of whom shall be licensed as a physician and surgeon in this state. Two years after the effective date of this section, any oral and maxillofacial surgeon appointed to the committee who is not licensed as a physician and surgeon shall hold a permit pursuant to this section.(3) The board shall solicit from the following organizations input and recommendations regarding members to be appointed to the credentialing committee:(A) The Medical Board of California.(B) The California Dental Association.(C) The California Association of Oral and Maxillofacial Surgeons.(D) The California Medical Association.(E) The California Society of Plastic Surgeons.(F) Any other source that the board deems appropriate.(4) The credentialing committee shall meet at a time and place directed by the board to evaluate applicants for permits. A quorum of three members shall be required for the committee to consider applicants and make recommendations to the board.(5) Each member of the credentialing committee shall serve at the pleasure of the board, and the board may vote to remove any member of the credentialing committee for continued neglect of duties required by law, incompetence, or unprofessional or dishonorable conduct. Notwithstanding the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the board may convene in closed session to consider any evidence relating to the removal of a member of the credentialing committee. The board shall only convene in closed session to the extent that it is necessary to protect the privacy of the member of the credentialing committee.(f) The board may adopt regulations for the issuance of the permit that it deems necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public.(g) A licensee shall only perform an elective facial cosmetic surgical procedure at a general acute care hospital, a licensed outpatient surgical facility, or an outpatient surgical facility accredited by the Joint Commission, the Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care (AAAHC), the Medicare Program, or an accreditation agency approved by the Medical Board of California pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1248.1 of the Health and Safety Code.(h) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:(1) “Elective cosmetic surgery” means any procedure defined as cosmetic surgery in subdivision (d) of Section 1367.63 of the Health and Safety Code, and excludes any procedure that constitutes reconstructive surgery, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1367.63 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) “Facial” means those regions of the human body described in Section 1625 and in any regulations adopted pursuant to that section by the board.(i) A holder of a permit issued pursuant to this section shall not perform elective facial cosmetic surgical procedures unless the permitholder has malpractice insurance or other financial security protection that would satisfy the requirements of Section 2216.2 and any regulations adopted thereunder.(j) A holder of a permit shall comply with the requirements of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1248.15 of the Health and Safety Code, and the reporting requirements specified in Section 2240, with respect to any surgical procedure authorized by this section, in the same manner as a physician and surgeon.(k) Any violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for the revocation or suspension of the person’s permit, license, or both, or the person may be reprimanded or placed on probation. Proceedings initiated by the board under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.(l) A permit issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period of two years and must be renewed by the permitholder at the time the dentist license is renewed.(m) A permitholder shall complete 24 hours of approved courses of study related to elective cosmetic surgery as a condition of renewal of a permit. Those courses of study shall be credited toward the total continuing education hours required by the board pursuant to Section 1645.(n) Permits issued prior to January 1, 2025, that limit the type of procedure under the general permit category provided under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) authorized to be performed by the permitholder shall not be renewed. This subdivision shall not apply to a permit that authorized the permitholder to practice any procedure under the general permit category specified under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b). The permitholder who seeks to continue performing the procedure previously limited by the permit shall submit an application to the board for issuance of a new permit under paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) and the board may request the permitholder to submit additional documentation demonstrating the permitholder’s competency for issuance of that permit. The application shall be treated as a renewal application for purposes of subdivision (m) of Section 1724.(o) On or before January 1, 2025, and every four years thereafter, the board shall report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature on all of the following:(1) The number of persons licensed pursuant to Section 1634 who apply to receive a permit to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery from the board pursuant to this section.(2) The number of persons receiving a permit from the board to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery.(3) The number of complaints filed by or on behalf of patients who have received elective facial cosmetic surgery by persons who have received a permit from the board to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery.(4) Action taken by the board resulting from complaints filed by or on behalf of patients who have received elective facial cosmetic surgery by persons who have received a permit from the board to perform elective facial cosmetic surgery.(p) As used in this section, “good standing” means the license is active and unrestricted by disciplinary action taken pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, is not the subject of an unresolved complaint or review procedure, and is not the subject of any unresolved disciplinary proceeding.SEC. 7.Section 1724 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1724.The amount of charges and fees for dentists licensed pursuant to this chapter shall be established by the board as is necessary for the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities required by this chapter as it relates to dentists, subject to the following limitations:(a)The fee for an application for licensure qualifying pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1632 shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).(b)The fee for an application for licensure qualifying pursuant to Section 1634.1 shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).(c)The fee for an application for licensure qualifying pursuant to Section 1635.5 shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).(d)The fee for an initial license and for the renewal of a license is five hundred twenty-five dollars ($525). On and after January 1, 2016, the fee for an initial license shall not exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650), and the fee for the renewal of a license shall not exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650). On and after January 1, 2018, the fee for an initial license shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800), and the fee for the renewal of a license shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).(e)The fee for an application for a special permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the renewal fee for a special permit shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).(f)The delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee for such a license or permit in effect on the date of the renewal of the license or permit.(g)The penalty for late registration of change of place of practice shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).(h)The fee for an application for an additional office permit shall not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750), and the fee for the renewal of an additional office permit shall not exceed three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375).(i)The fee for issuance of a replacement pocket license, replacement wall certificate, or replacement engraved certificate shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).(j)The fee for a provider of continuing education shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year.(k)The fee for application for a referral service permit and for renewal of that permit shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).(l)The fee for application for an extramural facility permit and for the renewal of a permit shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).(m)The fee for an application for an elective facial cosmetic surgery permit shall not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000), and the fee for the renewal of an elective facial cosmetic surgery permit shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).(n)The fee for an application for an oral and maxillofacial surgery permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of an oral and maxillofacial surgery permit shall not exceed one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200).(o)The fee for an application for a general anesthesia permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of a general anesthesia permit shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).(p)The fee for an onsite inspection and evaluation related to a general anesthesia or moderate sedation permit shall not exceed four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500).(q)The fee for an application for a moderate sedation permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of a moderate sedation permit shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).(r)The fee for an application for an adult oral conscious sedation certificate shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of an adult oral conscious sedation certificate shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).(s)The fee for an application for a pediatric minimal sedation permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of a pediatric minimal sedation permit shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).(t)The fee for an application for a pediatric endorsement for a general anesthesia permit or moderate sedation permit shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the fee for the renewal of a pediatric endorsement shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).(u)The fee for a certification of licensure shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125).(v)The fee for an application for the law and ethics examination shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).SEC. 8.Section 1750.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1750.1.(a)A dental assistant may perform the following duties under the general supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist:(1)Extraoral duties specified by the supervising licensee that meet the definition of a basic supportive dental procedure specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1741. These duties may include a procedure that requires the use of personal protective equipment, laboratory functions, and sterilization and disinfection procedures described in Section 1005 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 5193 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.(2)Operate dental radiography equipment for the purpose of oral radiography if the dental assistant has complied with the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 1750.(3)Perform intraoral and extraoral photography.(b)A dental assistant may perform the following duties under the direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist:(1)Apply nonaerosol and noncaustic topical agents, including all forms of topical fluoride.(2)Take intraoral impressions for all nonprosthodontic appliances.(3)Take facebow transfers and bite registrations.(4)Place and remove rubber dams or other isolation devices.(5)Place, wedge, and remove matrices for restorative procedures.(6)Remove postextraction dressings after inspection of the surgical site by the supervising licensed dentist.(7)Perform measurements for the purposes of orthodontic treatment.(8)Cure dental materials with a light curing device.(9)Examine orthodontic appliances.(10)Place and remove orthodontic separators.(11)Remove ligature ties and archwires.(12)After adjustment by the dentist, examine and seat removable orthodontic appliances and deliver care instructions to the patient.(13)Remove periodontal dressings.(14)Remove sutures after inspection of the site by the dentist.(15)Place patient monitoring sensors.(16)Adjust the flow of nitrous oxide and oxygen gases if deemed necessary and directed by the supervising dentist who shall be present in the operatory directly supervising the adjustment.(17)Extraoral functions specified by the supervising dentist that meet the definition of basic supportive dental procedures specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1741. These duties may include patient monitoring, placing monitoring sensors, taking of vital signs, or other extraoral procedures related to the scope of their practice.(18)In response to a medical emergency and under the direct supervision, order, control, and full professional responsibility of the licensed dentist, a dental assistant may administer or assist in the administration of oxygen.(c)The board may specify additional allowable duties by regulation.(d)The duties of a dental assistant or a dental assistant holding a permit in orthodontic assisting or in dental sedation shall not include any of the following procedures unless specifically allowed by law:(1)Diagnosis and comprehensive treatment planning.(2)Placing, finishing, or removing permanent restorations.(3)Surgery or cutting on hard and soft tissue including, but not limited to, the removal of teeth and the cutting and suturing of soft tissue.(4)Prescribing medication.(5)Starting the flow of nitrous oxide and oxygen gases.(6)Administration of local or general anesthesia or sedation.(e)Unless otherwise permitted in this section, the duties of a dental assistant do not include any duty or procedure that only a registered dental assistant, registered dental assistant in extended functions, orthodontic assistant, dental sedation assistant, registered dental hygienist, or registered dental hygienist in alternative practice is allowed to perform.(f)The placement of pit and fissure sealants may only be performed by a registered dental assistant, registered dental assistant in extended functions, registered dental hygienist, or registered dental hygienist in alternative practice.SEC. 9.SEC. 5. Section 1753 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1753. (a) On and after January 1, 2010, the board may license as a registered dental assistant in extended functions a person who files a completed application, pays the applicable fee, and submits written evidence, satisfactory to the board, of all of the following eligibility requirements:(1) Current, active, and valid licensure as a registered dental assistant.(2) A full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting a criminal history check.(3) Successful completion of either of the following:(A) An extended functions postsecondary program approved by the board in all of the procedures specified in Section 1753.5.(B) An extended functions postsecondary program approved by the board to teach the duties that registered dental assistants in extended functions were allowed to perform pursuant to board regulations prior to January 1, 2010, and a course approved by the board in the procedures specified in paragraphs (1), (2), (5), (6), and (8) to (12), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 1753.5.(4) Current certification in basic life support issued by American Red Cross, American Heart Association, American Safety and Health Institute, American Dental Association’s Continuing Education Provider Recognition Program, or Academy of General Dentistry’s Program Approval for Continuing Education.(5) Successful completion of a board-approved pit and fissure sealant course.(6) Passage of a written examination administered by the board, or its designee.(b) A registered dental assistant in extended functions with permits in either orthodontic assisting or dental sedation assisting shall be referred to as an “RDAEF with orthodontic assistant permit,” or “RDAEF with dental sedation assistant permit,” as applicable. These terms shall be used for reference purposes only and do not create additional categories of licensure.(c) Completion of the continuing education requirements established by the board pursuant to Section 1645 by a registered dental assistant in extended functions who also holds a permit as an orthodontic assistant or dental sedation assistant shall fulfill the continuing education requirement for such permit or permits.(d) The licensee shall be responsible for complying with all applicable licensure renewal requirements, including continuing education pursuant to Section 1645.SEC. 10.SEC. 6. Section 1753.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1753.5. (a) A registered dental assistant in extended functions licensed on or after January 1, 2010, is authorized to perform all duties and procedures that a registered dental assistant is authorized to perform as specified in and limited by Section 1752.4, and the duties in this section.(b) A registered dental assistant in extended functions licensed on or after January 1, 2010, is authorized to perform the following additional procedures under direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist:(1) Perform oral health assessments, including intraoral and extraoral soft tissue evaluations to identify oral lesions, classifying occlusion, performing myofunctional evaluations, and oral cancer screenings as authorized by the supervising dentist.(2) Perform oral health assessments in school-based, community health project settings under the direction of a dentist, registered dental hygienist, or registered dental hygienist in alternative practice.(3) Gingival retraction for impression and restorative procedures.(4) Size and fit endodontic master points and accessory points.(5) Cement endodontic master points and accessory points.(6) Perform post, core, and build-up procedures in conjunction with direct and indirect restorations.(7) Take final impression for permanent indirect restorations.(8) Take final impressions for tooth-borne removeable prosthesis.(9) Place, contour, finish, and adjust all direct restorations.(10) Adjust and adhere all permanent indirect restorations.(11) Polish and contour existing amalgam restorations.(12) Other procedures authorized by regulations adopted by the board.(c) A registered dental assistant in extended functions licensed on or after January 1, 2010, may perform a duty specified in this section using contemporary techniques and materials designed for use in the performance of that duty under the direct supervision and pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed dentist if the registered dental assistant in extended functions has completed the appropriate education and training, and whose skill, knowledge, and education in the use of such contemporary technique or material has been determined clinically competent by the supervising licensed dentist.SEC. 11.SEC. 7. Section 1754.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1754.5. (a) A radiation safety course shall have the primary purpose of providing theory, laboratory, and clinical application in radiographic techniques. The board shall approve only those courses that adhere to the minimum requirements of this section and applicable regulations adopted by the board.(b) A radiation safety course provider applying for initial board approval shall submit a completed application for course approval, on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the fee prescribed in subdivision (l) of Section 1725. applicable fee. The board may, in lieu of conducting its own investigation, accept the findings of any commission or accreditation agency approved by the board, or its designee, and adopt those findings as its own. The board may approve, provisionally approve, or deny approval after it evaluates all components of the course.(1) Provisional approval shall be limited to those courses that substantially comply with all existing standards for full approval and shall expire one year from the date of provisional approval or upon subsequent board approval or denial, whichever occurs first.(2) A provider of a course given provisional approval shall immediately notify each student of that status.(3) If the board provisionally approves or denies approval of a course, the board shall provide the specific reasons for the decision to the course director, in writing, within 90 days of that decision.(c) A board-approved radiation safety course shall be reevaluated at least every seven years, but may be subject to reevaluation and inspection by the board at any time to ensure compliance with this section. The board may withdraw approval at any time if it determines that the course does not meet the requirements of this section.(d) Aradiation A radiation safety course provider shall ensure the course complies with the Radiologic Technology Act (Section 27 of the Health and Safety Code) and applicable regulations. Providers shall render appropriate supervision, operation, and facilities for laboratory and clinical instruction, including compliance with all of the following requirements:(1) Laboratory and clinical instruction facilities shall comply with the applicable regulations of Subchapter 4 (commencing with Section 30100) of Chapter 5 of Division 1 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, and be equipped with supplies, materials, and equipment for instruction in radiation safety and practical work that include, for every six students, at least the following:(A) One functioning radiography (X-ray) machine that complies with all federal and state laws, including registration with the State Department of Public Health, and is equipped with the appropriate position-indicating devices for each technique being taught.(B) One X-ray training manikin head designed for instruction in radiographic techniques per X-ray unit.(C) One film view box or screen for viewing digital images.(D) Processing and viewing equipment. This facility requirement may be deemed met if computer-based equipment for digital radiographic procedures is solely or in part utilized within the program or course facility. The equipment may be located in the operatory area where exposures will occur.(2) The choice of image receptor for laboratory and clinical experiences shall be either traditional film or digital sensor or any combination thereof as determined by the course provider.(3) X-ray exposure areas shall provide protection to patients, students, faculty, and observers in full compliance with applicable federal and state laws.(e) A course in radiation safety shall be of sufficient duration for the student to achieve minimum competence, but not fewer than 32 hours composed of the following:(1) At least eight hours of didactic instruction.(2) At least 12 hours of laboratory instruction in which students receive supervised experience performing procedures using study models, manikins, or other simulation models.(3) At least 12 hours of clinical instruction in which students receive supervised experience in performing procedures in a clinical setting on patients.(f) A course shall establish specific instructional objectives. The theoretical aspects of the course shall provide the content necessary for students to make safe and ethical judgments regarding radiation safety.(g) Objective evaluation criteria shall be used for measuring student progress. Students shall be provided with specific performance objectives and the evaluation criteria that will be used for all evaluation and testing procedures.(h) Didactic instruction shall be provided in safe and educationally conducive lecture classrooms or through distance learning modalities. Areas of didactic instruction shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) Radiation physics and biology.(2) Radiation protection and safety.(3) Recognition of normal intraoral and extraoral anatomical landmarks.(4) Radiograph exposure and processing techniques.(5) Radiograph mounting or sequencing, and viewing, including anatomical landmarks of the oral cavity.(6) Intraoral techniques including holding devices and image receptors.(7) Proper use of patient protection devices and personal protective equipment for operator use.(8) Identification and correction of faulty radiographs.(9) Introduction to contemporary equipment and devices including the use of computerized digital radiography and extraoral imaging that may include panographs or cone-beam imaging.(10) Techniques and exposure guidelines for a variety of patients including, but not limited to, adult, pediatric, edentulous, partially edentulous, endodontic, and patients with special needs.(11) Radiographic record management.(i) A provider using distance learning modalities for didactic instruction shall do all of the following:(1) Before enrolling a student, notify the prospective student of the computer or communications technology necessary to participate in didactic instruction.(2) Provide technological assistance to students, as needed, to participate in didactic instruction.(3) Ensure completion of didactic instruction by the student before the student participates in laboratory instruction.(j) (1) For the student to achieve minimum competence in the application of dental radiographic techniques and radiation safety, the radiation safety course shall include all of the following:(A) Successful completion of laboratory experiences consisting of at least two bitewing radiographic series and two full mouth intraoral radiographic series using an X-ray training manikin designed for radiographic exposures utilizing any dental radiographic image receptor or device deemed appropriate by the course director. A student shall successfully complete laboratory instruction before the student participates in clinical instruction.(B) Successful completion of clinical experiences consisting of at least three full-mouth intraoral radiographic series using any dental radiographic image receptor or device deemed appropriate by the course director or supervising dentist.(C) Written evaluations of each radiographic series identifying errors, causes of errors, correction of errors, and, if applicable, the number of reexposures necessary for successful completion of a series to clinical competency.(2) Clinical radiographs shall be made using diagnostic criteria established by the course of instruction and shall in no event exceed three reexposures per series.(k) Before the student’s performance of procedures on patients, the student shall provide evidence to the radiation safety course provider of having completed a board-approved eight-hour course in infection control and current, valid certification in basic life support.(l) The student shall successfully complete a comprehensive written exam before the completion of the course. The exam shall include questions specific to dental radiographic installations and quality assurance for dental radiography addressed in Article 4 (commencing with Section 30305) of Group 3 of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 5 of Division 1 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations or its successor.(m) Extramural dental facilities may be utilized by a course, in accordance with board regulations, for the purposes of clinical experiences. A program or course using extramural dental facilities for dental radiographic clinical experiences shall provide to the board, upon request, copies of all contracts of affiliation and documentation demonstrating compliance with board regulations.(n) Upon successful completion of the course, students shall receive a certificate of completion as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 1741.(o) A radiation safety course provider previously board approved under Sections 1014 and 1014.1 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations shall maintain board approval until January 1, 2028. To obtain board approval to offer a radiation safety course on or after January 1, 2028, the radiation safety course provider shall apply for board approval to offer the course pursuant to subdivision (b).(p) The board may adopt regulations to implement this section.SEC. 12.Section 1755 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1755.(a)A course in infection control is one that has as its main purpose providing theory and clinical application in infection control practices and principles where the protection of the public is its primary focus. The board shall approve only those courses that adhere to the minimum requirements of this section and applicable regulations adopted by the board.(b)Except as provided in subdivision (i), for purposes of this article, a board-approved eight-hour course in infection control shall mean any of the following:(1)A board-approved eight-hour infection control course provided by a board-approved registered dental assisting education program.(2)An eight-hour infection control course approved by the board pursuant to Section 1070.6 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.(3)A board-approved eight-hour course, with six hours of didactic instruction and at least two hours of laboratory instruction using video or a series of video training tools, all of which may be delivered using asynchronous, synchronous, or online learning mechanisms or a combination thereof.(c)A provider of an infection control course offered to students for compliance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall submit an application on a form furnished by the board for board approval to offer the course, the applicable fee, and documentation of all of the following:(1)The course name, course provider name, course director name, business address, telephone number, and email address.(2)Proof that the course director possesses a valid, active, and current license issued by the board or the Dental Hygiene Board of California.(3)A detailed course outline, in writing, that clearly states the curriculum subject matter, hours of didactic and laboratory instruction, and specific instructional objectives. Instruction shall provide the content necessary for students to make safe and ethical judgments regarding infection control and asepsis.(4)Objective evaluation criteria that shall be used for measuring student progress. Students shall be provided with specific performance objectives and the evaluation criteria that will be used for course examination.(5)Proof that course instructors have experience in the instruction of Division of Occupational Safety and Health (Cal/OSHA) regulations, as set forth in Sections 330 to 344.90, inclusive, of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, and the board’s Minimum Standards for Infection Control, as set forth in Section 1005 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.(6)Documentation of didactic instruction that includes, at a minimum, all of the following as they relate to Cal/OSHA regulations, as set forth in Sections 300 to 344.90, inclusive, of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, and the board’s Minimum Standards for Infection Control, as set forth in Section 1005 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations:(A)Basic dental science and microbiology as they relate to infection control in dentistry.(B)Legal and ethical aspects of infection control procedures.(C)Terms and protocols specified in Section 1005 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations regarding the minimum standards for infection control.(D)Principles of modes of disease transmission and prevention.(E)Principles, techniques, and protocols of hand hygiene, personal protective equipment, surface barriers and disinfection, instruments and devices, sterilization, sanitation, and hazardous chemicals associated with infection control.(F)Principles, protocols, and procedures of sterilizer monitoring and the proper loading, unloading, storage, and transportation of instruments to work area.(G)Principles, protocols, and procedures associated with sharps management.(H)Principles, protocols, and procedures of infection control for laboratory areas.(I)Principles, protocols, and procedures of waterline maintenance.(J)Principles, protocols, and procedures of regulated and nonregulated waste management.(K)Principles, protocols, and procedures related to injury and illness prevention, hazard communication, general office safety, exposure control, postexposure requirements, and monitoring systems for radiation safety and sterilization systems.(7)Documentation of laboratory instruction that includes, at a minimum, demonstrations in the following areas as they relate to Cal/OSHA regulations, as set forth in Sections 300 to 344.90, inclusive, of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, and the board’s Minimum Standards for Infection Control, as set forth in Section 1005 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations:(A)Applying hand cleansing products and performing hand cleansing techniques, protocols, and procedures.(B)Applying, removing, and disposing of patient treatment gloves, utility gloves, overgloves, protective eyewear, masks, and clinical attire.(C) Handling instruments, surfaces, and situations where contamination is simulated, without actual contamination, from bloodborne and other pathogens being present.(D)Applying the appropriate techniques, protocols, and procedures for the preparation, sterilization, and storage of instruments, including, at a minimum, application of personal protective equipment, precleaning, ultrasonic cleaning, rinsing, sterilization wrapping, internal or external process indicators, labeling, sterilization, drying, storage, and delivery to work areas.(E)Precleaning and disinfecting contaminated operatory surfaces and devices, and properly using, placing, and removing surface barriers.(F)Maintaining sterilizer, including, at a minimum, proper instrument loading and unloading, operation cycling, spore testing, and handling and disposal of sterilization chemicals.(G)Applying work practice controls as they relate to the following classifications of sharps: anesthetic needles or syringes, orthodontic wires, and broken glass.(H)Applying infection control protocols and procedures for the following laboratory devices: impressions, bite registrations, and prosthetic appliances.(I)Performing waterline maintenance, including using water tests and purging waterlines.(J)Performing techniques for safe handling and disposal of contaminated regulated and nonregulated medical waste.(8)Written laboratory protocols that comply with the board’s Minimum Standards for Infection Control as set forth in Section 1005 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, and other federal, state, and local requirements governing infection control. The course shall provide these protocols to all students and course instructors to ensure compliance.(9)A written examination that reflects the curriculum content, which may be administered at intervals throughout the course, as determined by the course director, that shall be successfully completed by each student prior to issuance of the certificate of completion described in subdivision (g).(d)The board or its designee may approve, provisionally approve, or deny approval of the course after it evaluates all components of the course.(1)Provisional approval shall be limited to those courses that substantially comply with all existing standards for full approval and shall expire one year from the date of provisional approval or upon subsequent board approval or denial, whichever occurs first.(2)A provider of a course given provisional approval shall immediately notify each student of that status.(3)If the board provisionally approves or denies approval of a course, the board shall provide the specific reasons for the decision to the course director in writing within 90 days of that decision.(4)A board-approved infection control course shall be reevaluated at least every seven years, but may be subject to reevaluation and inspection by the board at any time to ensure compliance with this section. The board may withdraw approval at any time that it determines the course does not meet the requirements of this section.(e)The course director shall actively participate in and be responsible for the administration of the course and each of the following requirements:(1)Maintaining for a period of not less than five years copies of curricula, program outlines, objectives, grading criteria, course instructor credentials, licenses, and certifications, and individual student records, including those necessary to establish satisfactory completion of the course.(2)Informing the board of the closure of, or any major change to, the course, including changes to the course provider name, course director, business contact information, or course content, within 10 days of the closure or change.(3)Ensuring that all course instructors meet the requirements set forth in this section.(f)The course provider shall:(1)Prior to enrolling a student, provide notification to the prospective student of the computer or communications technology necessary to participate in didactic and laboratory instruction.(2)Provide technological assistance to students, as needed, to participate in didactic and laboratory instruction.(3)Ensure completion of didactic instruction by the student prior to the student’s participation in laboratory instruction.(g)Upon successful completion of the course, students shall receive a certificate of completion as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 1741.The certificate of completion shall state the statutory authority under paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b) for which the course has been approved.(h)Course records shall be subject to inspection by the board at any time.(i)A course taken pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall not satisfy completion of an infection control course required for licensure as a registered dental assistant or permit as an orthodontic assistant or dental sedation assistant.(j)The board may adopt regulations to implement this section.SEC. 13.SEC. 8. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 6 4 of this act, which amends Section 1638.1 of the Business and Professions Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:Making confidential the deliberations by the board and the personal information of the Elective Facial Cosmetic Surgery Permit Credentialing Committee member included in the records, documents, or forms reviewed by the board that lead to findings of neglect of duties, incompetence, or unprofessional or dishonorable conduct protects the Committee member’s right to privacy.SEC. 14.SEC. 9. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.